Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.300.565

Grants to implement emergency response systems.

Subject to funds appropriated specifically for this purpose, the office of the superintendent of public instruction shall allocate grants to school districts on a competitive basis for the purpose of implementing emergency response systems using evolving technology to expedite the response and arrival of law enforcement in the event of a threat or emergency at a school.

[ 2013 c 233 s 4.]